es: Área de aplicación del instrumento de viento-metal: Campana; Interior del estuche; Exterior del instrumento (superficies lacadas); Exterior del instrumento (superficies bañadas en plata); Interior/tubería del instrumento; Tudel; Boquilla (aro/copa/cuello); Varas (exterior); Vara de afinación (exterior); Universal/multiusos; Camisa de válvula (exterior); Otro
da: Anvendelsesområder for messinginstrumenter: Klangstykke; Kuffertens inderside; Instrumentets ydre (lakerede overflader); Instrumentets ydre (forsølvede overflader); Instrumentets indre/boring; Mundrør; Mundstykke (rand/kop/skaft); Træk (ydre); Stemmetræk (ydre); Universel/til alle formål; Ventilhus (ydre); Andet
th: ขอบเขตการใช้เครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง: ลำโพง; ด้านในกล่อง; ด้านนอกเครื่องดนตรี (พื้นผิวเคลือบแล็กเกอร์); ด้านนอกเครื่องดนตรี (พื้นผิวชุบเงิน); ด้านในเครื่องดนตรี/ท่อลม; ท่อลม; ปากเป่า (ขอบ/รูปถ้วย/ด้าม); สไลด์ (ด้านนอก); สไลด์เทียบเสียง (ด้านนอก); อเนกประสงค์; กระบอกวาล์ว (ด้านนอก); อื่นๆ
sv: Användningsområde för bleckblåsinstrument: Klockstycke; Fodralets insida; Instrumentets utsida (lackerade ytor); Instrumentets utsida (försilvrade ytor); Instrumentets insida/borrning; Munrör; Munstycke (kant/kopp/skaft); Byglar (utsida); Stämbygel (utsida); Universal / Allround; Ventilhus (utsida); Övrigt
en: Brass instrument application area: Bell; Case interior; Instrument exterior (lacquered surfaces); Instrument exterior (silver-plated surfaces); Instrument interior/bore; Leadpipe; Mouthpiece (rim/cup/shank); Slides (exterior); Tuning slide (exterior); Universal/All-purpose; Valve casing (exterior); Other
tr: Pirinç üflemeli çalgı uygulama alanı: Kalak; Çanta içi; Enstrüman dışı (cilalı yüzeyler); Enstrüman dışı (gümüş kaplama yüzeyler); Enstrüman içi/iç çap; Ağızlık borusu; Ağızlık (kenar/çanak/gövde); Sürgüler (dış); Akort sürgüsü (dış); Evrensel/Çok amaçlı; Piston yuvası (dış); Diğer
sk-SK: Oblasť aplikácie dychových nástrojov: Roztrub; Vnútro puzdra; Zovňajšok nástroja (lakované povrchy); Zovňajšok nástroja (postriebrené povrchy); Vnútro/vŕtanie nástroja; Ústnicová trubica; Náustok (okraj/kalíšok/stopka); Ťahce (zovňajšok); Ladiaci ťahec (zovňajšok); Univerzálna/viacúčelová; Puzdro ventilu (zovňajšok); Iné
pt-PT: Área de aplicações para instrumentos de sopro: Campânula; Interior do estojo; Exterior do instrumento (superfícies lacadas); Exterior do instrumento (superfícies prateadas); Interior/tubo do instrumento; Tudel; Bocal (bordo/copo/haste); Varas (exterior); Vara de afinação (exterior); Universal/multiusos; Camisa de válvula (exterior); Outro
nb: Bruksområde for messinginstrumenter: Sjallstykke; Innvendig etui; Utvendig instrument (lakkerte overflater); Utvendig instrument (forsølvede overflater); Innvendig instrument / rør; Munnrør; Munnstykke (rand/gryte/stilk); Sleider (utvendig); Stemmesleide (utvendig); Universell / alle formål; Ventilhus (utvendig); Annet
ro-RO: Zona de aplicare pe instrumentele din alamă: Pâlnie (clopot); Interiorul tocului; Exteriorul instrumentului (suprafețe lăcuite); Exteriorul instrumentului (suprafețe argintate); Interiorul instrumentului / țeavă; Tub principal; Muștiuc (inel/cupă/coadă); Culise (exterior); Culisă de acordaj (exterior); Universal/Multifuncțional; Carcasa valvelor (exterior); Altele
it: area app per strumenti a fiato: Campana; Interno della custodia; Esterno dello strumento (superfici laccate); Esterno dello strumento (superfici argentate); Interno/canne dello strumento; Cannello; Bocchino (bordo/tazza/penna); Pompe (esterno); Pompa di intonazione (esterno); Universale/multiuso; Camera della valvola (esterno); Altro
de: Anwendungsbereich bei Blechblasinstrumenten: Schallbecher; Koffer-Innenraum; Instrumentenaußenseite (lackierte Oberflächen); Instrumentenaußenseite (versilberte Oberflächen); Instrumenteninnenseite/Bohrung; Mundrohr; Mundstück (Rand/Kessel/Schaft); Züge (Außenseite); Stimmzug (Außenseite); Universell/Allzweck; Ventilgehäuse (Außenseite); Sonstige
sl-SI: Področje uporabe trobil: Odmevnik; Notranjost ohišja; Zunanjost inštrumenta (lakirane površine); Zunanjost inštrumenta (posrebrene površine); Notranjost inštrumenta/cev; Vodilna cev; Ustnik (rob/čaša/vrat); Potegi (zunanjost); Uglasitveni poteg (zunanjost); Univerzalno/večnamensko; Ohišje ventilov (zunanjost); Drugo
el: Περιοχή εφαρμογής χάλκινων οργάνων: Καμπάνα; Εσωτερικό θήκης; Εξωτερικό οργάνου (λουστραρισμένες επιφάνειες); Εξωτερικό οργάνου (επάργυρες επιφάνειες); Εσωτερικό οργάνου/αυλός; Σωλήνας; Επιστόμιο (χείλος/κύπελλο/στέλεχος); Ολισθητήρες (εξωτερικά); Ολισθητήρας κουρδίσματος (εξωτερικά); Γενικής χρήσης/Πολλαπλών χρήσεων; Περίβλημα βαλβίδας (εξωτερικά); Άλλο
bg-BG: Област на приложение на медни духови инструменти: Камбана; Вътрешност на калъфа; Външна част на инструмента (лакирани повърхности); Външна част на инструмента (посребрени повърхности); Вътрешна част на инструмента/отвор; Мундщукова тръба; Мундщук (венец/чашка/стебло); Цугове (външна част); Крона за настройване (външна част); Универсално/с общо предназначение; Вентилна кутия (външна част); Други
pl: Obszar zastosowania dla instrumentów blaszanych: Czara głosowa; Wnętrze futerału; Zewnętrzna część instrumentu (powierzchnie lakierowane); Zewnętrzna część instrumentu (powierzchnie posrebrzane); Wnętrze instrumentu/menzura; Rurka ustnikowa; Ustnik (rant/kociołek/nóżka); Suwaki (na zewnątrz); Suwak strojeniowy (na zewnątrz); Uniwersalne/wielofunkcyjne; Komora wentyla (na zewnątrz); Inne
ko: 금관악기 적용 부위: 벨; 케이스 내부; 악기 외부(래커 표면); 악기 외부(은도금 표면); 악기 내부/보어; 리드파이프; 마우스피스(림/컵/섕크); 슬라이드(외부); 튜닝 슬라이드(외부); 범용/다목적; 밸브 케이싱(외부); 기타
cs: Oblast použití: na žesťové nástroje: Ozvučník; Vnitřek pouzdra; Vnějšek nástroje (lakované povrchy); Vnějšek nástroje (postříbřené povrchy); Vnitřek nástroje / vrtání; Ústnice; Nátrubek (okraj/kotlík/stopka); Tahy (vnějšek); Ladicí tah (vnějšek); Univerzální / víceúčelové; Pouzdro ventilu (vnějšek); Jiné
pt-BR: Área de aplicação do instrumentos de sopro: Campana; Interior do estojo; Exterior do instrumento (superfícies laqueadas); Exterior do instrumento (superfícies prateadas); Interior do instrumento/tubo; Tudel; Bocal (borda/copo/haste); Varas (exterior); Pompa de afinação (exterior); Universal/Multiuso; Caixa de válvula (exterior); Outro
ru: Область духового инструмента для применения: Раструб; Внутри футляра; Корпус инструмента (лакированные поверхности); Корпус инструмента (посеребренные поверхности); Внутри инструмента / канал; Мундштучная трубка; Мундштук (поля/чашка/ножка); Кулисы (снаружи); Крон общего строя (снаружи); Универсальное/общего назначения; Корпус помпы (снаружи); Другое
ja: 金管楽器適用エリア: ベル; ケース内側; 楽器外装 (ラッカー仕上げ); 楽器外装 (銀メッキ仕上げ); 楽器内装/ボア; リードパイプ; マウスピース (リム/カップ/シャンク); スライド (外側); チューニングスライド (外側); ユニバーサル/多目的; バルブケーシング (外側); その他
zh-CN: 铜管乐器应用领域: 喇叭口; 乐器盒内部; 乐器外部（漆面）; 乐器外部（镀银表面）; 乐器内部/管膛; 吹管; 号嘴（边缘/杯身/号口）; 滑管（外部）; 调音管（外部）; 通用/多用途; 阀套（外部）; 其他
fr: Zone d’application pour instruments de la famille des cuivres: Pavillon; Intérieur de l'étui; Extérieur de l'instrument (surfaces vernies); Extérieur de l'instrument (surfaces argentées); Intérieur de l'instrument/perce; Branche d'embouchure; Embouchure (bord/cuvette/queue); Coulisses (extérieur); Coulisse d'accord (extérieur); Universel/tout usage; Chambre de piston (extérieur); Autre
hr-HR: Područje primjene limenih instrumenata: Zvono; Unutrašnjost kofera; Vanjska strana instrumenta (lakirane površine); Vanjska strana instrumenta (posrebrene površine); Unutrašnjost instrumenta / provrt; Usna cijev; Usnik (rub/čašica/cijev); Povlačci (izvana); Povlačak za ugađanje (izvana); Univerzalno / višenamjensko; Kućište ventila (izvana); Ostalo
nl: Koperblazers toepassingsgebied: Beker; Binnenkant koffer; Buitenkant instrument (gelakte oppervlakken); Buitenkant instrument (verzilverde oppervlakken); Binnenkant instrument/boring; Mondpijp; Mondstuk (rand/cup/stift); Schuiven (buitenkant); Stemschuif (buitenkant); Universeel/multifunctioneel; Ventielhuis (buitenkant); Overig
fi: Vaskipuhaltimen käyttöalue: Kello; Kotelon sisäosa; Soittimen ulkopinta (lakatut pinnat); Soittimen ulkopinta (hopeoidut pinnat); Soittimen sisäosa/putki; Suuputki; Suukappale (reunus/kuppi/varsi); Vetoputket (ulkopinta); Viritysputki (ulkopinta); Yleiskäyttöinen; Venttiilikotelo (ulkopinta); Muu
vi: Khu vực ứng dụng trên nhạc cụ bằng đồng thau: Loa kèn; Bên trong hộp đựng; Bên ngoài nhạc cụ (bề mặt phủ sơn mài); Bên ngoài nhạc cụ (bề mặt mạ bạc); Bên trong/lòng nhạc cụ; Ống dẫn; Búp kèn (vành/chén/chuôi); Ống trượt (bên ngoài); Ống trượt chỉnh âm (bên ngoài); Phổ quát/Đa dụng; Vỏ van (bên ngoài); Khác
zh-TW: 銅管樂器應用區域: 喇叭口; 樂器盒內部; 樂器外部 (烤漆表面); 樂器外部 (鍍銀表面); 樂器內部/管腔; 吹口管; 吹嘴 (邊緣/杯口/杯管); 滑管 (外部); 調音管 (外部); 通用/多用途; 活塞套管 (外部); 其他
hu: Rézfúvós hangszer alkalmazási területe: Tölcsér; Tok belseje; Hangszer külseje (lakkozott felületek); Hangszer külseje (ezüstözött felületek); Hangszer belseje/furat; Fúvókacső; Fúvóka (perem/csésze/szár); Tolócsövek (külseje); Hangolócső (külseje); Univerzális/Általános célú; Szelepház (külseje); Egyéb
lt-LT: Varinio pučiamojo instrumento naudojimo sritis: Garsatūbis; Dėklo vidus; Instrumento išorė (lakuoti paviršiai); Instrumento išorė (sidabruoti paviršiai); Instrumento vidus / kanalas; Mundštuko vamzdelis; Mundštukas (kraštas / taurė / kotelis); Slankikliai (išorė); Derinimo slankiklis (išorė); Universalus / bendrosios paskirties; Vožtuvo korpusas (išorė); Kita